California statutes. Penal Code
(a) Standards for the minimum time interval between transmissions of information about the location of the person under supervision. The standards shall be established after an evaluation of, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) The resources of the department.

(2) The criminal history of the person under supervision.

(3) The safety of the victim of the persons under supervision.

(b) Standards for the accuracy of the information identifying the location of the person under supervision. The standards shall be established after consideration of, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) The need to identify the location of a person proximate to the location of a crime, including a violation of parole.

(2) Resources of the department.

(3) The need to avoid false indications of proximity to crimes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 484, Sec. 2.   Effective October 4, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3010.4.

(a) The department, operating a system of continuous electronic monitoring pursuant to this section, shall establish prohibitions against unauthorized access to, and use of, information by private or public entities as may be deemed appropriate. Unauthorized access to, and use of, electronic signals includes signals transmitted in any fashion by equipment utilized for continuous electronic monitoring.

(b) Devices used pursuant to this article shall not be used to eavesdrop or record any conversation, except a conversation between the participant and the person supervising the participant that is to be used solely for the purposes of voice identification.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 484, Sec. 2.   Effective October 4, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3010.5.

(a) The department shall have the sole discretion to decide which persons shall be supervised using continuous electronic monitoring administered by the department. No individual shall be required to participate in continuous electronic monitoring authorized by this article for any period of time longer than the term of parole.

(b) The department shall establish written guidelines that identify those persons on parole subject to continuous electronic monitoring authorized by this article. These guidelines shall include the need for enhancing monitoring in comparison to other persons not subject to the enhanced monitoring and the public safety needs that will be served by the enhanced monitoring.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 484, Sec. 2.   Effective October 4, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3010.6.

A parole officer may revoke, in his or her discretion, the continuous monitoring of any individual.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 484, Sec. 2.   Effective October 4, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3010.7.

Whenever a parole officer supervising an individual has reasonable cause to believe that the individual is not complying with the rules or conditions set forth for the use of continuous electronic monitoring as a supervision tool, the officer supervising the individual may, without a warrant of arrest, take the individual into custody for a violation of parole.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 484, Sec. 2.   Effective October 4, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3010.9.

It is the intent of the Legislature that continuous electronic monitoring established pursuant to this article maintain the highest public confidence, credibility, and public safety. In the furtherance of these standards, the following shall apply:

(a) The department may administer continuous electronic monitoring pursuant to written contracts and appropriate public or private agencies or entities to provide specified supervision services. No public or private agency or entity may operate a continuous electronic monitoring system as authorized by this section without a written contract with the department. No public or private agency or entity entering into a contract may itself employ any person who is a participant in continuous electronic monitoring surveillance.

(b) The department shall comply with Section 1090 of the Government Code in the consideration, making, and execution of contracts pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 484, Sec. 2.   Effective October 4, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3010.10.

(a) A person who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 as a condition of parole shall report to his or her parole officer within one working day following release from custody, or as instructed by a parole officer to have an electronic, global positioning system (GPS), or other monitoring device affixed to his or her person.

(b) A person who is required to register as a sex offender
 pursuant to Section 290 shall not remove, disable, render inoperable, or knowingly circumvent the operation of, or permit another to remove, disable, render inoperable, or knowingly circumvent the operation of, an electronic,
 GPS, or other monitoring device affixed to his or her person as a condition of parole, when he or she knows that the device was affixed as a condition of parole.

(c) (1) This section does not apply if the
 removal, disabling, rendering inoperable, or circumvention of the electronic, GPS, or other monitoring device is performed by a physician, emergency medical services technician, or by any other emergency response or medical personnel when doing so is necessary during the course of medical treatment of the person subject to the electronic, GPS, or other monitoring device.

(2) This section does not apply if the removal, disabling, rendering inoperable, or knowingly circumventing the operation of the electronic, GPS, or other monitoring device is authorized or required by a court, or by the law enforcement, probation, parole authority, or other entity responsible for placing the electronic, GPS, or other monitoring device upon the person, or that has, at the time, the authority and responsibility to monitor the electronic,
 GPS, or other monitoring device.

(d) Unless the parole authority finds that in the interests of justice it is not appropriate in a particular case, upon a violation of subdivision (a), the parole authority shall revoke the person’s parole and require that he or she be incarcerated in a county jail for 180 days.

(e) Upon a violation of
 subdivision (b), the parole authority shall revoke the person’s parole and require that he or she be incarcerated in a county jail for 180 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 603, Sec. 1.   (AB 2121)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.3. Parole Reentry Accountability Program  [3015. - 3015.]

3015.

(a) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall establish a parole reentry accountability program for parolees who have been sentenced to a term of imprisonment under Section 1170. The purpose of the program is to promote public safety, hold parolees accountable, and reduce recidivism.

(b) The department shall employ a parole violation decisionmaking instrument to determine the most appropriate sanctions for these parolees who violate their conditions of parole.

(1) For purposes of this subdivision, a “parole violation decisionmaking instrument” means a standardized tool that provides ranges of appropriate sanctions for parole violators given relevant case factors, including, but not limited to, offense history, risk of reoffense based on a validated risk assessment tool, need for
 treatment services, the number and type of current and prior parole violations, and other relevant statutory requirements.

(2) The department shall adopt emergency regulations to implement this section initially, and shall subsequently adopt permanent regulations that make appropriate changes in policies and procedures to reflect the intent of this section.

(c) The secretary shall have the discretion to establish additional tools and standards to further the purposes of this section.

(d) Parolees who have been sentenced to a term of imprisonment under Section 1170 and offenders subject to postrelease supervision as established in the Postrelease Community Supervision Act of 2011 with a history of substance abuse or mental illness who violate their conditions of parole or postrelease supervision are eligible to participate in a reentry court program established pursuant to subdivision (e).

(1) A parolee or offender subject to postrelease supervision who is deemed eligible by the department or local supervising agency to participate in a reentry court program may be referred by his or her parole officer, local
 supervising agent, or a revocation hearing officer for participation in the program. The reentry court shall have the discretion to determine if the parolee or offender subject to postrelease supervision will be admitted into the program and, in making this determination, shall consider, among other factors, whether the offender will benefit from the program, the risk the offender
 poses to the community, and the history and nature of the committing offense.

(2) If the reentry court determines that the parolee or offender subject to postrelease supervision will be admitted into the program, the court, with the assistance of the participant’s parole or local supervising agent, shall have exclusive authority to determine the appropriate conditions of parole
 or postrelease supervision, order rehabilitation and treatment services to be provided, determine appropriate incentives, order appropriate sanctions, lift parole holds, and hear and determine appropriate responses to alleged violations, unless and until the court terminates the participant’s enrollment in the program authorized by subdivision (e).

(3) A reentry court program plan shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) The anticipated number of parolees and offenders subject to postrelease supervision who will be served by the program.

(B) The method by which
 each parolee or offender subject to postrelease supervision who is eligible for the program shall be referred to the program.

(C) The method by which each parolee or offender subject to postrelease supervision is to be individually assessed as to his or her treatment and rehabilitative needs and the level of community and reentry court monitoring required by the program.

(D) The criteria for continued participation in, and successful completion of, the program, as well as the criteria for termination from the program and referral to the
 revocation process pursuant to Section 3000.08 for parolees and Section 3454 for offenders subject to postrelease supervision.

(E) A description of how the program shall be administered effectively.

(F) An established method by which to report outcome measures for program participants.

(G) The development of a program team, as well as a plan for ongoing training in utilizing the drug court and collaborative court nonadversarial model.

(e) (1) Subject to funding made available for this purpose, the secretary shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the Administrative Office of the Courts for the purpose of the establishment and operation of reentry court
 programs. Only courts with existing drug and mental health courts or courts that otherwise demonstrate leadership and a commitment to conduct the reentry court authorized by this section may participate in this program. These reentry court programs shall, with the assistance of the participant’s parole or postrelease supervision
 agent, direct the treatment and supervision of participants who would benefit from community drug treatment or mental health treatment. The purpose of reentry court programs created pursuant to this subdivision is to promote public safety, hold offenders accountable, and reduce recidivism. The program shall include key components of drug and collaborative courts using a highly structured model, including close supervision and monitoring, dedicated calendars, nonadversarial proceedings, frequent drug and alcohol testing, and close collaboration between the respective entities involved to improve the
 participant’s likelihood of success on parole or postrelease supervision.

(2) The Judicial Council, in collaboration with the department, shall design and perform an evaluation of the program that will assess its effectiveness in reducing recidivism among parolees and offenders subject to postrelease supervision and reducing revocations.

(3) The Judicial Council, in collaboration with the department, shall submit a final report of the findings from its evaluation of the program to the Legislature and the Governor no later than 3 years after the establishment of a reentry court pursuant to this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 43.   (AB 117)   Effective June 30, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, pursuant to Secs. 68 and 69 of Ch. 39.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.4. Case Management Reentry Pilot Program [3016. - 3016.]

3016.

(a) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall establish the Case Management Reentry Pilot Program for offenders under the jurisdiction of the department who have been sentenced to a term of imprisonment under Section 1170 and are likely to benefit from a case management reentry strategy designed to address homelessness, joblessness, mental disorders, and developmental disabilities among offenders transitioning from prison into the community. The purpose of the pilot program is to implement promising and evidence-based practices and strategies that promote improved public safety outcomes for offenders reentering society after serving a term in state prison and while released to parole.

(b) The program shall be initiated in at least three
 counties over three years, supported by department employees focusing primarily on case management services for eligible parolees selected for the pilot program. Department employees shall be experienced or trained to work as social workers with a parole population. Selection of a parolee for participation in the pilot program does not guarantee the availability of services.

(c) Case management social workers shall assist offenders on parole who are assigned to the program in managing basic needs, including housing, job training and placement, medical and mental health care, and any additional programming or responsibilities attendant to the terms of the offender’s reentry requirements. Case management social workers also shall work closely with offenders to prepare, monitor, revise, and fulfill individualized offender reentry plans consistent with this section during the term of the program.

(d) Individualized offender reentry plans shall focus on connecting offenders to services for which the offender is eligible under existing federal, state, and local rules.

(e) Case management services shall be prioritized for offenders identified as potentially benefiting from assistance with the following:

(1) Food, including the immediate need and long-term planning for obtaining food.

(2) Clothing, including the immediate need to obtain appropriate clothing.

(3) Shelter, including obtaining housing consistent with the goals of the most independent, least restrictive and potentially durable housing in the local community and that are feasible for the circumstances of each reentering offender.

(4) Benefits, including, but not limited to, the California Work Opportunity and Responsibility to Kids program, general assistance, benefits administered by the federal Social Security Administration, Medi-Cal, and veterans benefits.

(5) Health services, including assisting parolee clients with accessing community mental health, medical, and dental treatment.

(6) Substance abuse services, including assisting parolee clients with obtaining community substance abuse treatment or related 12-step program information and locations.

(7) Income, including developing and implementing a feasible plan to obtain an income and employment reflecting the highest level of work appropriate for a reentering offender’s abilities and experience.

(8) Identification cards, including assisting reentering offenders with obtaining state identification cards.

(9) Life skills, including assisting with the development of skills concerning money management, job interviewing, resume writing, and activities of daily living.

(10) Activities, including working with reentering offenders in choosing and engaging in suitable and productive activities.

(11) Support systems, including working with reentering offenders on developing a support system, which may consist of prosocial friends, family, and community groups and activities, such as religious activities, recovery groups, and other social events.

(12) Academic and vocational programs, including
 assisting reentering offenders in developing and implementing a realistic plan to achieve an academic education, or vocational training, or both.

(13) Discharge planning, including developing postparole plans to sustain parolees’ achievements and goals to ensure long-term community success.

(f) The department shall contract for an evaluation of the pilot program that will assess its effectiveness in reducing recidivism among offenders transitioning from prison into the community.

(g) The department shall submit a final report of the findings from its evaluation of the pilot program to the Legislature and the Governor no later than July 31, 2017.

(h) Implementation of this article is contingent on the availability of funds and the pilot program may be
 limited in scope or duration based on the availability of funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 237.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Interdisciplinary Assessment of Inmates [3020. - 3021.]

3020.

The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall conduct assessments of all inmates that include, but are not limited to, data regarding the inmate’s history of substance abuse, medical and mental health, education, family background, criminal activity, service in the United States military, and social functioning. The assessments shall be used to place the inmate in programs that will aid in
 his or her reentry to society and that will most likely reduce the inmate’s chances of reoffending.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 184, Sec. 1.   (AB 2357)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

3021.

A credentialed teacher, vice principal, or principal shall provide input relating to the academic or vocational education program placement of an inmate pursuant to Section 3375 of Title 15 of the California Code of Regulations, including, but not limited to, interviewing the inmate, verifying the inmate’s education records and test scores, or being present at meetings relating to the academic or vocational education program placement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 761, Sec. 1.   (SB 1121)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Paroles [3040. - 3073.1.]

3040.

The Board of Parole Hearings shall have the power to allow prisoners imprisoned in the state prisons pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1168 to go upon parole outside the prison walls and enclosures. The board may parole prisoners in the state prisons to camps for paroled prisoners established under Section 2792.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 311, Sec. 11.   (SB 883)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3041.

(a) (1) In the case of any inmate sentenced pursuant to any law, other than Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 1170) of Title 7 of Part 2, the Board of Parole Hearings shall meet with each inmate during the sixth year before the inmate’s minimum eligible parole date for the purposes of reviewing and documenting the inmate’s activities and conduct pertinent to parole eligibility. During this consultation, the board shall provide the inmate information about the parole hearing process, legal factors relevant to his or her suitability or unsuitability for parole, and individualized recommendations for the inmate regarding his or her work assignments, rehabilitative programs, and institutional behavior. Within 30 days following the
 consultation, the board shall issue its positive and negative findings and recommendations to the inmate in writing.

(2) One year before the inmate’s minimum eligible parole date a panel of two or more commissioners or deputy commissioners shall again meet with the inmate and shall normally grant parole as provided in Section 3041.5. No more than one member of the panel shall be a deputy commissioner.

(3) In the event of a tie vote, the matter shall be referred for an en banc review of the record that was before the panel that rendered the tie vote. Upon en banc review, the board shall vote to either grant or deny parole and render a statement of decision. The en banc review shall be conducted pursuant to subdivision (e).

(4) Upon a grant of parole, the inmate shall be released subject to all applicable review periods. However, an inmate shall not be released before reaching his or her minimum eligible parole date as set pursuant to Section 3046 unless the inmate is eligible for earlier release pursuant to his or her youth offender parole eligibility date or elderly parole eligible date.

(5) At least one commissioner of the panel shall have been present at the last preceding meeting, unless it is not feasible to do so or where the last preceding meeting was the initial meeting. Any person on the hearing panel may request review of any decision regarding parole for an en banc hearing by the board. In case of a review, a majority vote in favor of parole by the board members participating in an en banc review is required to grant parole to any
 inmate.

(b) (1) The panel or the board, sitting en banc, shall grant parole to an inmate unless it determines that the gravity of the current convicted offense or offenses, or the timing and gravity of current or past convicted offense or offenses, is such that consideration of the public safety requires a more lengthy period of incarceration for this individual.

(2) After July 30, 2001, any decision of the parole panel finding an inmate suitable for parole shall become final within 120 days of the date of the hearing. During that period, the board may review the panel’s decision. The panel’s decision shall become final pursuant to this subdivision unless the board finds that the panel made an error of law, or that the panel’s decision was based on an error
 of fact, or that new information should be presented to the board, any of which when corrected or considered by the board has a substantial likelihood of resulting in a substantially different decision upon a rehearing. In making this determination, the board shall consult with the commissioners who conducted the parole consideration hearing.

(3) A decision of a panel shall not be disapproved and referred for rehearing except by a majority vote of the board, sitting en banc, following a public meeting.

(c) For the purpose of reviewing the suitability for parole of those inmates eligible for parole under prior law at a date earlier than that calculated under Section 1170.2, the board shall appoint panels of at least two persons to meet annually with each inmate until the time the
 person is released pursuant to proceedings or reaches the expiration of his or her term as calculated under Section 1170.2.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that, during times when there is no backlog of inmates awaiting parole hearings, life parole consideration hearings, or life rescission hearings, hearings will be conducted by a panel of three or more members, the majority of whom shall be commissioners. The board shall report monthly on the number of cases where an inmate has not received a completed initial or subsequent parole consideration hearing within 30 days of the hearing date required by subdivision (a) of Section 3041.5 or paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 3041.5, unless the inmate has waived the right to those timeframes. That report shall be considered the backlog of cases for purposes of this section,
 and shall include information on the progress toward eliminating the backlog, and on the number of inmates who have waived their right to the above timeframes. The report shall be made public at a regularly scheduled meeting of the board and a written report shall be made available to the public and transmitted to the Legislature quarterly.

(e) For purposes of this section, an en banc review by the board means a review conducted by a majority of commissioners holding office on the date the matter is heard by the board. An en banc review shall be conducted in compliance with the following:

(1) The commissioners conducting the review shall consider the entire record of the hearing that resulted in the tie vote.

(2) The
 review shall be limited to the record of the hearing. The record shall consist of the transcript or audiotape of the hearing, written or electronically recorded statements actually considered by the panel that produced the tie vote, and any other material actually considered by the panel. New evidence or comments shall not be considered in the en banc proceeding.

(3) The board shall separately state reasons for its decision to
 grant or deny parole.

(4) A commissioner who was involved in the tie vote shall be recused from consideration of the matter in the en banc review.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 676, Sec. 1.   (AB 1448)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

3041.1.

(a) Any time before an inmate’s release, the Governor may request review of a decision by a parole authority concerning the grant or denial of parole to any inmate in a state prison. The Governor shall state the reason or reasons for the request, and whether the request is based on a public safety concern, a concern that the gravity of current or past convicted offenses may have been given inadequate consideration, or on other factors.

(b) If a request has been made, the request shall be reviewed by a majority of commissioners specifically appointed to hear adult parole matters and who are holding office at the time. In case of a review, a vote in favor of parole by a majority of the commissioners reviewing the request shall be required to grant parole to any
 inmate. In carrying out any review, the board shall comply with this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 470, Sec. 2.   (SB 230)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3041.2.

(a) During the 30 days following the granting, denial, revocation, or suspension by the board of the parole of an inmate sentenced to an indeterminate prison term based upon a conviction of murder, the Governor, when reviewing the board’s decision pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article V of the Constitution, shall review materials provided by the board.

(b) If the Governor decides to reverse or modify a parole decision of the board pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8 of Article V of the Constitution, he or she shall send a written statement to the inmate specifying the reasons for his or her decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 470, Sec. 3.   (SB 230)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3041.5.

(a) At all hearings for the purpose of reviewing an inmate’s parole suitability, or the setting, postponing, or rescinding of parole, with the exception of en banc review of tie votes, the following shall apply:

(1) At least 10 days before any hearing by the Board of Parole Hearings, the inmate shall be permitted to review the file which will be examined by the board and shall have the opportunity to enter a written response to any material contained in the file.

(2) The inmate shall be permitted to be present, to ask and answer questions, and to speak on his or her own behalf. Neither the inmate nor the attorney for the inmate shall be entitled to ask questions of any person appearing at the hearing
 pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3043.

(3) Unless legal counsel is required by some other law, a person designated by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall be present to ensure that all facts relevant to the decision be presented, including, if necessary, contradictory assertions as to matters of fact that have not been resolved by departmental or other procedures.

(4) The inmate and any person described in subdivision (b) of Section 3043 shall be permitted to request and receive a stenographic record of all proceedings.

(5) If the hearing is for the purpose of postponing or rescinding parole, the inmate shall have the rights set forth in paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 2932.

(6) The board shall set a date to
 reconsider whether an inmate should be released on parole that ensures a meaningful consideration of whether the inmate is suitable for release on parole.

(b) (1) Within 10 days following any decision granting parole, the board shall send the inmate a written statement setting forth the reason or reasons for granting parole, the conditions he or she must meet in order to be released, and the consequences of failure to meet those conditions.

(2) Within 20 days following any decision denying parole, the board shall send the inmate a written statement setting forth the reason or reasons for denying parole, and suggest activities in which he or she might participate that will benefit him or her while he or she is incarcerated.

(3) The board shall schedule the next hearing, after considering the
 views and interests of the victim, as follows:

(A) Fifteen years after any hearing at which parole is denied, unless the board finds by clear and convincing evidence that the criteria relevant to the decision denying parole are such that consideration of the public and victim’s safety does not require a more lengthy period of incarceration for the inmate than 10 additional years.

(B) Ten years after any hearing at which parole is denied, unless the board finds by clear and convincing evidence that the criteria relevant to the decision denying parole are such that consideration of the public and victim’s safety does not require a more lengthy period of incarceration for the inmate than seven additional years.

(C) Three years, five years, or seven years after any hearing at which parole is denied, because the criteria
 relevant to the decision denying parole are such that consideration of the public and victim’s safety requires a more lengthy period of incarceration for the inmate, but does not require a more lengthy period of incarceration for the inmate than seven additional years.

(4) The board may in its discretion, after considering the views and interests of the victim, advance a hearing set pursuant to paragraph (3) to an earlier date, when a change in circumstances or new information establishes a reasonable likelihood that consideration of the public and victim’s safety does not require the additional period of incarceration of the inmate provided in paragraph (3).

(5) Within 10 days of any board action resulting in the rescinding of parole, the board shall send the inmate a written statement setting forth the reason or reasons for that action, and shall schedule the inmate’s next
 hearing in accordance with paragraph (3).

(c) The board shall conduct a parole hearing pursuant to this section as a de novo hearing. Findings made and conclusions reached in a prior parole hearing shall be considered in but shall not be deemed to be binding upon subsequent parole hearings for an inmate, but shall be subject to reconsideration based upon changed facts and circumstances. When conducting a hearing, the board shall admit the prior recorded or memorialized testimony or statement of a victim or witness, upon request of the victim or if the victim or witness has died or become unavailable. At each hearing the board shall determine the appropriate action to be taken based on the criteria set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 3041.

(d) (1) An inmate may request that the board exercise its discretion to advance a hearing set
 pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) to an earlier date, by submitting a written request to the board, with notice, upon request, and a copy to the victim which shall set forth the change in circumstances or new information that establishes a reasonable likelihood that consideration of the public safety does not require the additional period of incarceration of the inmate.

(2) The board shall have sole jurisdiction, after considering the views and interests of the victim to determine whether to grant or deny a written request made pursuant to paragraph (1), and its decision shall be subject to review by a court or magistrate only for a manifest abuse of discretion by the board. The board shall have the power to summarily deny a request that does not comply with this subdivision or that does not set forth a change in circumstances or new information as required in paragraph (1) that in the judgment of the board is sufficient to justify
 the action described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b).

(3) An inmate may make only one written request as provided in paragraph (1) during each three-year period. Following either a summary denial of a request made pursuant to paragraph (1), or the decision of the board after a hearing described in subdivision (a) to deny parole, the inmate shall not be entitled to submit another request for a hearing pursuant to subdivision (a) until a three-year period of time has elapsed from the summary denial or decision of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 470, Sec. 4.   (SB 230)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Note: This section was amended on Nov. 4, 2008, by initiative Prop. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

3041.6.

The Board of Parole Hearings may conduct proceedings by videoconference. All references in this article and Article 4 of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 2960) of this title to a participant’s statutory right to meet, be present, appear, or to represent the interests of the people or another participant at a proceeding shall be satisfied by the participant’s appearance by videoconference at the proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 80, Sec. 11.   (AB 145)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3041.7.

At any hearing for the purpose of setting, postponing, or rescinding a parole release date of an inmate under a life sentence, the inmate shall be entitled to be represented by counsel and Section 3041.5 shall apply. The Board of Parole Hearings shall provide by rule for the invitation of the prosecutor of the county from which the inmate was committed, or his or her representative, to represent the interests of the people at the hearing. The Board of Parole Hearings shall notify the prosecutor and the Attorney General at least 30 days before the date of the hearing.

Notwithstanding Section 12550 of the Government Code, the prosecutor of the county from which the inmate was committed, or his or her representative, who shall not be the Attorney General, except in cases
 in which the Attorney General prosecuted the case at the trial level, shall be the sole representative of the interests of the people.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 470, Sec. 5.   (SB 230)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3041.8.

(a) The Board of Parole Hearings shall translate all of the following documents into the five most common languages spoken by incarcerated persons who are eligible for a parole hearing:

(1) Blank templates of notices used to explain the rights of incarcerated persons during the parole hearing process.

(2) Blank templates of notices used to provide procedural information to incarcerated persons about the parole hearing process.

(3) Blank templates of forms used by an incarcerated person to file a grievance alleging there has been a denial of the person’s rights under the Americans with Disabilities Act.

(4) Blank templates of forms used by an incarcerated person to file a petition to advance their next parole hearing date.

(b) If a material change is made to the templates of notices or templates of forms described in subdivision (a), the board shall update the translated version within a reasonable time.

(c) At least once every five years, the board shall determine the five most common languages spoken by incarcerated persons who are eligible for a parole hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 826, Sec. 1.   (AB 2310)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

3042.

(a) (1) At least 30 days before the Board of Parole Hearings meets to review or consider the parole suitability of any inmate sentenced to a life sentence, the board shall send written notice thereof to each of the following persons: the attorney who represented the defendant at trial, the district attorney of the county in which the offense was committed, the law enforcement agency that investigated the case, and, if the inmate was convicted of the murder of a peace officer, the law enforcement agency that employed the peace officer at the time of the murder.

(2) If the inmate was convicted of the murder of a firefighter, the board or the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall also send the written notice described in paragraph
 (1) to the fire department that employed the firefighter at the time of the murder, if that fire department registers with the board to receive that notification and provides the appropriate contact information.

(b) The Board of Parole Hearings shall record all of those hearings and transcribe recordings of those hearings within 30 days of any hearing. Those transcripts, including the transcripts of all prior hearings, shall be filed and maintained in the office of the Board of Parole Hearings and shall be made available to the public no later than 30 days from the date of the hearing. An inmate shall not be released on parole until 60 days from the date of the hearing have elapsed.

(c) At any hearing, the presiding hearing officer shall state their findings and supporting reasons on the record.

(d) Any statements,
 recommendations, or other materials considered shall be incorporated into the transcript of the hearing, unless the material is confidential in order to preserve institutional security and the security of others who might be endangered by disclosure.

(e) The board shall review and consider all relevant and reliable information received from any person and shall consider imposing special conditions of parole to reflect the comments or concerns raised by this information, as appropriate.

(f) This section does not limit the type or content of information any person may forward to the board for consideration under any other law.

(g) Any person who receives notice under subdivision (a) who is authorized to forward information for consideration in a parole
 consideration hearing for a person sentenced to a life sentence under this section, may forward that information by electronic mail. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall establish procedures for receiving the information by electronic mail pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 311, Sec. 12.   (SB 883)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3043.
